Georgia, session 2025_26, HB496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 4 of Title 17 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
arrest by law enforcement officers generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to
read as follows:
"17-4-31.
(a) The scent of marijuana, cannabis, or hemp on its own, whether burnt or not, shall not
provide a law enforcement officer with reasonable suspicion or probable cause for a stop,
search, seizure, or arrest.
(b) A law enforcement officer shall not:
(1) Stop a person or motor vehicle based solely on the scent of marijuana, cannabis, or
hemp on its own, whether burnt or not; or
H. B. 496
- 1 -

LC 48 1429
(2) Search, or request to search, a motor vehicle, driver, or passenger in a motor vehicle,
based solely on the scent of marijuana, cannabis, or hemp on its own, whether burnt or
not."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 496
- 2 -